Arkansas, session 2025, SB272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Under the authority granted by Arkansas Constitution,
Amendment 51, § 19, Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 6, concerning
voter registration application forms, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(d)(1) The voter registration application form shall be delivered to
an applicant with the party affiliation field blank.
(2) The voter registration application form shall not contain a
pre-filled party affiliation field.

/s/Crowell

*SSS143*
03-03-2025 13:51:49 SSS143